Utah statutes.
38-1a-207.   Registry classification.

(1)  The registry is classified as a public record under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, unless the division classifies it otherwise.

(2)  A request for information submitted to the designated agent is not subject to Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.

(3)  A person desiring information contained in a public record in the registry shall request the information from the designated agent.

(4)  The designated agent may charge a commercially reasonable fee allowed by the designated agent's contract with the division for providing information under Subsection (3).

(5)  Notwithstanding Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, if information is available in a public record contained in the registry, a person may not request the information from the division.

(6) (a)  A person may request information that is not a public record contained in the registry from the division in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.

(b)  The division shall inform the designated agent of how to direct an inquiry made to the designated agent for information that is not a public record contained in the registry.



Enacted by Chapter 278, 2012 General Session

